Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.110

Intercepting, recording, or disclosing private communications—Not unlawful for building owner—Conditions.

It shall not be unlawful for the owner or person entitled to use and possession of a building, as defined in RCW 9A.04.110(5), or the agent of such person, to intercept, record, or disclose communications or conversations which occur within such building if the persons engaged in such communication or conversation are engaged in a criminal act at the time of such communication or conversation by virtue of unlawful entry or remaining unlawfully in such building.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 363 s 4.]